District of Columbia statutes.
38-2759

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

History

June 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-107, § 10, 61 DCR 3489